District of Columbia statutes.
42-1904.10

Copies of declaration and bylaws to be furnished to purchaser by declarant.

Unless previously furnished, an exact copy of the recorded declaration and bylaws shall be furnished to each purchaser by the declarant within 10 days of recordation thereof as provided for in §§ 42-1902.01 and 42-1902.05.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title IV, § 410, 23 DCR 9532b
1981 Ed., § 45-1870.
1973 Ed., § 5-1270.